Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.53
State emergency response teams; personnel; powers; duties; rights; immunities; compensation.

Personnel of state emergency response teams while on duty, whether within or without the state, shall: (1) If they are employees of the state, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; (2) if they are employees of a political subdivision of the state, and whether serving within or without such political subdivision, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; and (3) if they are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, be entitled to compensation by the state at rates to be established by the Governor and shall be entitled to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this state. State emergency response teams shall, while on duty, be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of emergency management activities in the area in which they are serving and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 6(2), p. 1078;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.14;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 18;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 176;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 33.